Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2718.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin BOLDER OPTIONS YOUTH MENTORING; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Bolder Options Youth Mentoring Program to provide disadvantaged youth ages 12 through 22 with intensive one-to-one wellness, goal setting, and academic-focused mentorship; programming that teaches life and job-seeking skills; career and college achievement coaches; and connections to employment, job training, and education opportunities. The grant must serve youth in the Bolder Options program in the Twin Cities and Rochester, Minnesota. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end